Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2454.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 36-12-1 and 36-12-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-12 entitled
"Insurance Benefits" are hereby amended to read as follows:
36-12-1. Definitions.
The following words, as used in §§ 36-12-1 — 36-12-14, shall have the following
meanings:
(1) “Employer,” means the state of Rhode Island.
(2) “Employee,” means all persons who are classified employees as the term “classified
employee” is defined under § 36-3-3, and all persons in the unclassified and non-classified service
of the state, including adjunct facility members at any state community college, state college or
state university, who teach at least fifty percent (50%) of the faculty load worked by regular full-
time faculty in an academic semester; provided, however, that the following shall not be included
as “employees” under §§ 36-12-1 — 36-12-14:
(i) Part-time personnel whose work week is less than twenty (20) hours a week and limited
period and seasonal personnel;
(ii) Members of the general assembly, its clerks, doorkeepers, and pages.
(3) “Dependents” means an employee’s spouse, domestic partner and unmarried children
under nineteen (19) years of age. Domestic partners shall certify by affidavit to the benefits director
of the division of personnel that the (i) partners are at least eighteen (18) years of age and are
mentally competent to contract, (ii) partners are not married to anyone, (iii) partners are not related

by blood to a degree which would prohibit marriage in the state of Rhode Island, (iv) partners reside
together and have resided together for at least one year, (v) partners are financially interdependent
as evidenced by at least two (2) of the following: (A) domestic partnership agreement or
relationship contract; (B) joint mortgage or joint ownership of primary residence, (C) two (2) of:
(I) joint ownership of motor vehicle; (II) joint checking account; (III) joint credit account; (IV)
joint lease; and/or (D) the domestic partner has been designated as a beneficiary for the employee’s
will, retirement contract or life insurance. Misrepresentation of information in the affidavit will
result in an obligation to repay the benefits received, and a civil fine not to exceed one thousand
dollars ($1,000) enforceable by the attorney general and payable to the general fund. The employee
will notify the benefits director of the division of personnel by completion of a form prescribed by
the benefits director when the domestic partnership ends.
(4) “Retired employee,” means all persons retired from the active service of the state, who,
immediately prior to retirement, were employees of the state as determined by the retirement board
under § 36-8-1, and also all retired teachers who have elected to come under the employees’
retirement system of the state of Rhode Island.
(5) “State retiree,” means all persons retired from the active service of the state who,
immediately prior to retirement, were employees of the state as determined by the retirement board
under § 36-8-1.
(6) “Teacher retiree,” means all retired teachers who have elected to come under the
employees’ retirement system of the state of Rhode Island.
(7) “Long-term healthcare insurance,” means any insurance policy or rider advertised,
marketed, offered, or designed to provide coverage for not less than twelve (12) consecutive months
for each covered person on an expense incurred, indemnity, prepaid, or other basis for one or more
necessary or medically necessary diagnostic, preventive, therapeutic, rehabilitative, maintenance,
or personal care services, provided in a setting other than an acute care unit of a hospital. The term
includes: group and individual policies or riders whether issued by insurers, fraternal benefit
societies, nonprofit health, hospital, and medical service corporations; prepaid health plans, health
maintenance organizations; or any similar organization. Long-term healthcare insurance shall not
include: any insurance policy which is offered primarily to provide basic medicare supplement
coverage; basic hospital expense coverage; basic medical-surgical expense coverage; hospital
confinement indemnity coverage; major medical expense coverage; disability income protection
coverage; accident only coverage; specified disease or specified accident coverage; or limited
benefit health coverage. This list of excluded coverages is illustrative and is not intended to be all
inclusive.
LC004812 - Page 2 of 5

(8) “Non-Medicare-eligible retiree healthcare insurance,” means the health benefit
employees who retire from active service of the state (subsequent to July 1, 1989), who immediately
prior to retirement were employees of the state as determined by the retirement board pursuant to
§ 36-8-1, shall be entitled to receive until attaining Medicare eligibility. This healthcare insurance
shall be equal to semi-private hospital care, surgical/medical care and major medical with a one
hundred seventy-five dollar ($175) calendar year deductible. The aforementioned program will be
provided on a shared basis in accordance with § 36-12-4.
(9) “Medicare-eligible retiree healthcare insurance,” means the health benefit employees
who retire from active service of the state (subsequent to July 1, 1989), who immediately prior to
retirement were employees of the state as determined by the retirement board pursuant to § 36-8-
1, shall have access to when eligible for Medicare. This healthcare insurance shall include plans
providing hospital care, surgical/medical services, rights and benefits which, when taken together
with their federal Medicare program benefits, 42 U.S.C. § 1305 et seq., shall be comparable to
those provided for retirees prior to the attainment of Medicare eligibility.
(10) “Health reimbursement arrangement,” or “HRA” means an account that:
(i) Is paid for and funded solely by state contributions;
(ii) Reimburses a Medicare-eligible state retiree for medical care expenses as defined in §
213(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which includes reimbursements for
healthcare insurance premiums;
(iii) Provides reimbursements up to a maximum dollar amount for a coverage period; and
(iv) Provides that any unused portion of the maximum dollar amount at the end of a
coverage period is carried forward to increase the maximum reimbursement amount in subsequent
coverage periods.
36-12-2. Hospital care and surgical-medical service benefits.
(a) Employees of the state of Rhode Island shall receive, in addition to wages, salaries, and
any other remuneration or benefits, hospital care and surgical-medical services, rights, and benefits
purchased by the director of administration pursuant to § 36-12-6, with the specific condition that
the benefits and services provided by the carrier(s) will be substantially equivalent to those set forth
in any collective bargaining agreement(s) executed between the state of Rhode Island and
authorized representatives of the unions representing state employees or the health care coverage
presently being provided. Adjunct faculty members at any state community college, state college
or state university, who teach at least fifty percent (50%) of the faculty load hours worked by regular
full-time faculty in any academic semester, shall be eligible for benefits as provided for in this
section.
LC004812 - Page 3 of 5

(b) The state will work diligently with leadership of organized labor in order to ensure
competitive, cost effective health care services for all employees of the state who may be eligible
for those benefits.
(c) Any new plan must accept pre-existing conditions for those individuals who will be
covered by the new policy.
(d) Part-time employees whose work week is less than twenty (20) hours a week may
purchase the benefits set forth above. The employees shall pay the same rate for the benefits as the
group rate paid by the state for the benefits. Payments for the benefits may be deducted in
accordance with the provisions of § 36-12-3.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004812
========
LC004812 - Page 4 of 5